Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-510.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-510.01. Notice; personal service of process A. A person who is ordered to undergo involuntary evaluation has the right to receive by personal service the documents specified in section 36-529, subsection E. A person who is the subject of a petition for court-ordered treatment has the right to receive by personal service the documents specified in section 36-536, subsection D. Personal service shall be completed by a peace officer,  or a process server or by another person authorized by rule 4, Arizona rules of civil procedure as prescribed by law or court rule or as ordered by the court, personally handing the documents to the person receiving service. The person who serves the specified documents must file a proof of service with the court that specifies the date, time and manner of service. B. In a proceeding under this chapter involving a petition for court-ordered evaluation or court-ordered treatment, if the proposed patient is ADMITTED TO A FACILITY THAT IS LICENSED AS A SCREENING AGENCY OR AN evaluation agency PURSUANT TO THIS CHAPTER at the time the petition is filed, the court may authorize a person employed by the SCREENING AGENCY OR evaluation agency to serve the documents specified in section 36-529, subsection E or SECTION 36-536, subsection D, as applicable, on the proposed patient. B. C. A county, city or town that employs peace officers may contract with a process server or another person authorized by rule 4, Arizona rules of civil procedure, A SCREENING AGENCY OR AN EVALUATION AGENCY to provide service pursuant to this section instead of service by a peace officer. C. D. An evaluation agency OR SCREENING AGENCY is not financially responsible under subsection A of this section for serving the documents required by section 36-529, subsection E or section 36-536, subsection D. e. An evaluation agency or screening agency may only receive reimbursement for the service of documents under subsection B of this section pursuant to a contract with a county. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.